Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 15. Motor Vehicle Safety — Responsibility
§ 63-15-57.
Substitution of proof of financial responsibility.

The department shall consent to the cancellation of any bond or certificate of insurance, or the department shall direct and the state treasurer shall return any money or securities to the person entitled thereto, upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-27; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 27, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-59.
Requirement of new proof of financial responsibility.

Whenever any proof of financial responsibility filed under the provisions of this chapter no longer fulfills the purposes for which required, the department shall, for the purpose of this chapter, require other proof as required by this chapter and shall suspend the license or the nonresident’s operating privilege pending the filing of such other proof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-28; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-61.
Duration of maintenance of proof of financial responsibility; cancellation, return or waiver of proof of financial responsibility.

In all cases, under this chapter, in which a person is required to furnish proof of financial responsibility, he shall maintain such proof for a period of three years, except as otherwise required or permitted in this section. The department shall, upon request, consent to the immediate cancellation of any bond or certificate of insurance, or the department shall direct and the state treasurer shall return to the person entitled thereto any money or securities deposited pursuant to this chapter as proof of financial responsibility, or the department shall waive the requirement of filing proof, in any of the following events:

at any time after three years from the date such proof was required when, during the three-year period preceding the request, the department has not received record of a conviction or a forfeiture of bail which would require or permit the suspension or revocation of the license or nonresident’s operating privilege of the person by or for whom such proof was furnished; or

in the event of the death of the person on whose behalf such proof was filed or the permanent incapacity of such person to operate a motor vehicle; or

in the event the person who has given proof surrenders his license to the department.

However, the department shall not consent to the cancellation of any bond or the return of any money or securities in the event any action for damages upon a liability covered by such proof is then pending or any judgment upon any such liability is then unsatisfied, or in the event the person who has filed such bond or deposited such money or securities has, within one year immediately preceding such request, been involved as an operator or owner in any motor vehicle accident resulting in injury or damage to the person or property of others. An affidavit of the applicant as to the nonexistence of such facts, or that he has been released from all of his liability, or has been finally adjudicated not to be liable, for such injury or damage, shall be sufficient evidence thereof in the absence of evidence to the contrary in the records of the department.

Whenever any person whose proof has been cancelled or returned under provision (c) of this section applies for a license within a period of three years from the date proof was originally required, any such application shall be refused unless the applicant shall reestablish such proof for the remainder of such three-year period.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-29; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 29; Laws, 1960, ch. 411, § 5; Laws, 1968, ch. 473, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 12, 1968).

§ 63-15-63.
Transfer of title to vehicle to member of family by person whose license has been suspended or cancelled.

No person whose license or registration has been suspended or cancelled under the provisions of this chapter shall transfer title to the vehicle owned by him to any member of his immediate family until such person has furnished proof of financial responsibility as is otherwise required by the provisions of this chapter and same shall have been approved by the department. A member of a person’s immediate family under the provisions hereof shall include any person related to the transferor by blood or marriage within the third degree computed according to the civil law and any person, whether related or not, residing within the same household as the transferor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-30; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 29-a; Laws, 1958, ch. 491.

§ 63-15-65.
Assigned risk plans.

Insurance companies, authorized to issue motor vehicle liability policies in this state, shall establish an administrative agency and make necessary reasonable rules in connection therewith, relative to the formation of a plan and procedure to provide a means by which insurance may be assigned to an authorized insurance company for a person required by this chapter to show proof of financial responsibility for the future and who is in good faith entitled to motor vehicle liability insurance in this state, but is unable to secure it through ordinary methods. Such insurance companies shall establish a plan and procedure for the equitable apportionment among such authorized companies of applicants for such policies and for motor vehicle liability policies, including, but not limited to, voluntary agreements by insurance companies to accept such assignments. The premium for assigned risk plans shall not exceed the basic manual rate for risks of like classification at time of application, plus any surcharge as set by the insurance commission. When any such plan has been approved by the insurance commission, all insurance companies authorized to issue motor vehicle liability policies in the State of Mississippi, shall subscribe thereto and participate therein.

The insurance commission may determine, fix, prescribe, promulgate, change, and amend rates or minimum premiums normally applicable to a risk so as to apply to any and every assignment such rates and minimum premiums as are commensurate with the greater hazard of the risk, considering in connection therewith the experience, physical or other conditions of such risk of the person applying for insurance under any such plan.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-35; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 34; Laws, 1958, ch. 443.

§ 63-15-67.
Surrender of license or registration.

Any person whose license or registration shall have been suspended as provided in this chapter, or whose policy of insurance or bond, when required under this chapter, shall have been cancelled or terminated, or who shall neglect to furnish other proof upon request of the department, shall immediately return his license to the department. If any person shall fail to return to the department his license as provided herein, the department shall forthwith direct any peace officer to secure possession thereof and to return the same to the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-31; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 30, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-69.
Particular offenses and penalties.

Where any person fails to report an accident as required in Section 63-15-9, in addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the department shall suspend the license of the person failing to make such report, or the nonresident’s operating privilege of such person, until such report has been filed and for such further period not to exceed thirty (30) days as the department may fix.

Any person who gives information required in a report or otherwise as provided for in Section 63-15-9, knowing or having reason to believe that such information is false, or who shall forge, or without authority, sign any evidence of proof of financial responsibility, or who files or offers for filing any such evidence of proof, knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or signed without authority, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both, except where the statement may be made under oath, in which case the person making the false statement under oath shall, upon conviction, be subject to the penalties for perjury.

Any person whose license or nonresident’s operating privilege has been suspended or revoked under this chapter, and who, during such suspension or revocation drives any motor vehicle upon any highway or knowingly permits any motor vehicle owned by such person to be operated by another upon any highway, except as permitted under this chapter, shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

Any person willfully failing to return his license as required in Section 63-15-67, shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter for which no penalty is otherwise provided shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

In order for an individual who has received a license suspension under the State of Mississippi’s Implied Consent Laws to be eligible for reinstatement, in addition to other requirements at law, he or she must provide to the Department of Public Safety, a certificate of insurance as a method of giving proof of financial responsibility as provided in Sections 63-15-37(1), 63-15-39 and 63-15-41, that shall be maintained for not less than a period of three (3) years after issuance in accordance with the requirements as set forth in Section 63-15-61.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-32; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 31; Laws, 1970, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 63-15-71.
Furnishing by department of abstract relating to person’s operating record; fees.

The department shall, upon request and receipt of proper fees, furnish any person a certified abstract of the operating record of any person subject to the provisions of this chapter, which abstract shall also fully designate the motor vehicles, if any, registered in the name of such person. If there shall be no record of any conviction of such person of violating any law relating to the operation of a motor vehicle or of any injury or damage caused by such person, the department shall so certify.

In addition to any other fees, the department shall charge and collect Two Dollars ($2.00) for furnishing a certified abstract to any person. This additional fee shall be deposited into the Disability and Relief Fund for the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-03; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 63-15-73.
Effect of chapter upon motor vehicle laws.

This chapter shall in no respect be considered as a repeal of the motor vehicle laws of this state but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-36; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 35, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-75.
Effect of chapter upon right of plaintiff to rely upon other legal processes.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 8285-38; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 37, eff from and after January 1, 1953.